Florida, session 2026, SB788.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 65 66 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 408.821, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 408.821âEmergency management planning; emergency 69 operations; inactive license.â 70 (4)âThe agency may adopt rules relating to emergency 71 management planning, communications, and operations. Licensees 72 providing residential or inpatient services must use utilize an 73 online database approved by the agency to report information to 74 the agency regarding the providerâs emergency status, planning, 75 or operations. The agency may authorize support agencies and 76 organizations that assist the state as part of the Emergency 77 Support Function 8 of the State Emergency Response Team to 78 access, use, and run reports in the database when responding to 79 declared emergencies. 80 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 408.822, Florida 81 Statutes, is amended to read: 82 408.822âDirect care workforce survey.â 83 (5)âThe agency shall continually analyze the results of the 84 surveys and publish the results on its website in the form of 85 aggregate data on a state or regional basis and in a manner 86 sufficient to ensure that a licensed facility cannot be 87 identified. The agency shall update the information published on 88 its website monthly. 89 Section 3.âSubsection (3) of section 429.07, Florida 90 Statutes, is amended to read: 91 429.07âLicense required; fee.â 92 (3)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 408.806, each 93 license granted by the agency must state the type of care for 94 which the license is granted. Licenses shall be issued for one 95 or more of the following categories of care: standard, extended 96 congregate care, limited nursing services, or limited mental 97 health. An assisted living facility may retain such license 98 until licensure renewal, regardless of whether the facility 99 currently has residents using such services. However, if a 100 facility is no longer staffed to provide these specialty 101 services, it must notify the agency of such lapse in staffing 102 immediately, and again once the facility is properly staffed to 103 resume providing such specialty services. 104 (a)âA standard license shall be issued to facilities 105 providing one or more of the personal services identified in s. 106 429.02. Such facilities may also employ or contract with a 107 person licensed under part I of chapter 464 to administer 108 medications and perform other tasks as specified in s. 429.255. 109 (b)âAn extended congregate care license shall be issued to 110 each facility that has been licensed as an assisted living 111 facility for 2 or more years and that provides services, 112 directly or through contract, beyond those authorized in 113 paragraph (a), including services performed by persons licensed 114 under part I of chapter 464 and supportive services, as defined 115 by rule, to persons who would otherwise be disqualified from 116 continued residence in a facility licensed under this part. An 117 extended congregate care license may be issued to a facility 118 that has a provisional extended congregate care license and 119 meets the requirements for licensure under subparagraph 2. The 120 primary purpose of extended congregate care services is to allow 121 residents the option of remaining in a familiar setting from 122 which they would otherwise be disqualified for continued 123 residency as they become more impaired. A facility licensed to 124 provide extended congregate care services may also admit an 125 individual who exceeds the admission criteria for a facility 126 with a standard license, if he or she is determined appropriate 127 for admission to the extended congregate care facility. 128 1.âIn order for extended congregate care services to be 129 provided, the agency shall must first determine whether that all 130 requirements established in law and rule are met and shall must 131 specifically designate, on the facilityâs license, that such 132 services may be provided and whether the designation applies to 133 all or part of the facility. This designation may be made at the 134 time of initial licensure or relicensure, or upon request in 135 writing by a licensee under this part and part II of chapter 136 408. The notification of approval or the denial of the request 137 shall be made in accordance with part II of chapter 408. Each 138 existing facility that qualifies to provide extended congregate 139 care services must have maintained a standard license and may 140 not have been subject to administrative sanctions during the 141 previous 2 years, or since initial licensure if the facility has 142 been licensed for less than 2 years, for any of the following 143 reasons: 144 a.âA class I or class II violation; 145 b.âThree or more repeat or recurring class III violations 146 of identical or similar resident care standards from which a 147 pattern of noncompliance is found by the agency; 148 c.âThree or more class III violations that were not 149 corrected in accordance with the corrective action plan approved 150 by the agency; 151 d.âViolation of resident care standards which results in 152 requiring the facility to employ the services of a consultant 153 pharmacist or consultant dietitian; 154 e.âDenial, suspension, or revocation of a license for 155 another facility licensed under this part in which the applicant 156 for an extended congregate care license has at least 25 percent 157 ownership interest; or 158 f.âImposition of a moratorium pursuant to this part or part 159 II of chapter 408 or initiation of injunctive proceedings. 160 161 The agency may deny or revoke a facilityâs extended congregate 162 care license for not meeting the criteria for an extended 163 congregate care license as provided in this subparagraph. 164 2.âIf an assisted living facility has been licensed for 165 less than 2 years, the initial extended congregate care license 166 must be provisional and may not exceed 6 months. The licensee 167 shall notify the agency, in writing, when it has admitted at 168 least one extended congregate care resident, after which an 169 unannounced inspection shall be made to determine compliance 170 with the requirements of an extended congregate care license. A 171 licensee with a provisional extended congregate care license 172 which demonstrates compliance with all the requirements of an 173 extended congregate care license during the inspection shall be 174 issued an extended congregate care license. In addition to 175 sanctions authorized under this part, if violations are found 176 during the inspection and the licensee fails to demonstrate 177 compliance with all assisted living facility requirements during 178 a follow-up followup inspection, the licensee must shall 179 immediately suspend extended congregate care services, and the 180 provisional extended congregate care license expires. The agency 181 may extend the provisional license for not more than 1 month in 182 order to complete a follow-up followup visit. 183 3.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 184 congregate care services shall maintain a written progress 185 report on each person who receives such nursing services from 186 the facilityâs staff which describes the type, amount, duration, 187 scope, and outcome of services that are rendered and the general 188 status of the residentâs health. A registered nurse, or 189 appropriate designee, representing the agency shall visit the 190 facility at least twice a year to monitor residents who are 191 receiving extended congregate care services and to determine 192 whether if the facility is in compliance with this part, part II 193 of chapter 408, and relevant rules. One of the visits may be in 194 conjunction with the regular survey. The monitoring visits may 195 be provided through contractual arrangements with appropriate 196 community agencies. A registered nurse shall serve as part of 197 the team that inspects the facility. The agency may waive one of 198 the required yearly monitoring visits for a facility that has: 199 a.âHeld an extended congregate care license for at least 24 200 months; 201 b.âNo class I or class II violations and no uncorrected 202 class III violations; and 203 c.âNo ombudsman council complaints that resulted in a 204 citation for licensure. 205 4.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 206 congregate care services must: 207 a.âDemonstrate the capability to meet unanticipated 208 resident service needs. 209 b.âOffer a physical environment that promotes a homelike 210 setting, provides for resident privacy, promotes resident 211 independence, and allows sufficient congregate space as defined 212 by rule. 213 c.âHave sufficient staff available, taking into account the 214 physical plant and firesafety features of the building, to 215 assist with the evacuation of residents in an emergency. 216 d.âAdopt and follow policies and procedures that maximize 217 resident independence, dignity, choice, and decisionmaking to 218 permit residents to age in place, so that moves due to changes 219 in functional status are minimized or avoided. 220 e.âAllow residents or, if applicable, a residentâs 221 representative, designee, surrogate, guardian, or attorney in 222 fact to make a variety of personal choices, participate in 223 developing service plans, and share responsibility in 224 decisionmaking. 225 f.âImplement the concept of managed risk. 226 g.âProvide, directly or through contract, the services of a 227 person licensed under part I of chapter 464. 228 h.âIn addition to the training mandated in s. 429.52, 229 provide specialized training as defined by rule for facility 230 staff. 231 5.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 232 congregate care services is exempt from the criteria for 233 continued residency set forth in rules adopted under s. 429.41. 234 A licensed facility must adopt its own requirements within 235 guidelines for continued residency set forth by rule. However, 236 the facility may not serve residents who require 24-hour nursing 237 supervision. A licensed facility that provides extended 238 congregate care services must also provide each resident with a 239 written copy of facility policies governing admission and 240 retention. 241 6.âBefore the admission of an individual to a facility 242 licensed to provide extended congregate care services, the 243 individual must undergo a medical examination as provided in s. 244 429.26(5) and the facility must develop a preliminary service 245 plan for the individual. 246 7.âIf a facility can no longer provide or arrange for 247 services in accordance with the residentâs service plan and 248 needs and the facilityâs policy, the facility must make 249 arrangements for relocating the person in accordance with s. 250 429.28(1)(k). 251 (c)âA limited nursing services license shall be issued to a 252 facility that provides services beyond those authorized in 253 paragraph (a) and as specified in this paragraph. 254 1.âIn order for limited nursing services to be provided in 255 a facility licensed under this part, the agency must first 256 determine whether that all requirements established in law and 257 rule are met and must specifically designate, on the facilityâs 258 license, that such services may be provided. This designation 259 may be made at the time of initial licensure or licensure 260 renewal, or upon request in writing by a licensee under this 261 part and part II of chapter 408. Notification of approval or 262 denial of such request shall be made in accordance with part II 263 of chapter 408. An existing facility that qualifies to provide 264 limited nursing services must have maintained a standard license 265 and may not have been subject to administrative sanctions that 266 affect the health, safety, and welfare of residents for the 267 previous 2 years or since initial licensure if the facility has 268 been licensed for less than 2 years. 269 2.âA facility that is licensed to provide limited nursing 270 services shall maintain a written progress report on each person 271 who receives such nursing services from the facilityâs staff. 272 The report must describe the type, amount, duration, scope, and 273 outcome of services that are rendered and the general status of 274 the residentâs health. A registered nurse representing the 275 agency shall visit the facility at least annually to monitor 276 residents who are receiving limited nursing services and to 277 determine whether if the facility is in compliance with 278 applicable provisions of this part, part II of chapter 408, and 279 related rules. The monitoring visits may be provided through 280 contractual arrangements with appropriate community agencies. A 281 registered nurse shall also serve as part of the team that 282 inspects such facility. Visits may be in conjunction with other 283 agency inspections. The agency may waive the required yearly 284 monitoring visit for a facility that has: 285 a.âHad a limited nursing services license for at least 24 286 months; 287 b.âNo class I or class II violations and no uncorrected 288 class III violations; and 289 c.âNo ombudsman council complaints that resulted in a 290 citation for licensure. 291 3.âA person who receives limited nursing services under 292 this part must meet the admission criteria established by the 293 agency for assisted living facilities. When a resident no longer 294 meets the admission criteria for a facility licensed under this 295 part, arrangements for relocating the person shall be made in 296 accordance with s. 429.28(1)(k), unless the facility is licensed 297 to provide extended congregate care services. 298 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 429.17, Florida 299 Statutes, is amended to read: 300 429.17âExpiration of license; renewal; conditional 301 license.â 302 (2)âA license shall be renewed in accordance with part II 303 of chapter 408 and the provision of satisfactory proof of 304 ability to operate and conduct the facility in accordance with 305 the requirements of this part and adopted rules, including proof 306 that the facility has received a satisfactory firesafety 307 inspection, conducted by the local authority having jurisdiction 308 or the State Fire Marshal, within the preceding 12 months. If an 309 application for renewal is submitted within 30 days after the 310 expiration date of the license, the application must be accepted 311 for review if the application submission contains an explanation 312 of the reason for the submission after licensure expiration; 313 however, late fees may still be imposed. 314 Section 5.âSection 429.212, Florida Statutes, is created to 315 read: 316 429.212âReferral agencies for assisted living facilities.â 317 (1)âAs used this section, the term: 318 (a)ââConsumerâ means a person seeking a referral to an 319 assisted living facility. 320 (b)ââReferral agencyâ means a person or entity that 321 provides assisted living facility referrals to consumers for a 322 fee collected from a consumer or a facility. The term does not 323 include: 324 1.âAn assisted living facility or its employees; or 325 2.âA resident of an assisted living facility, or a 326 residentâs family member who refers a consumer to the facility 327 regardless of any discount or other remuneration the community 328 pays to that person. 329 (c)ââReferralâ means the act of directing, recommending, or 330 facilitating the connection of a person, or his or her 331 representative, to an assisted living facility, with the intent 332 of assisting the person in obtaining long-term care, housing, or 333 related services, where the referring person or entity receives 334 compensation, including, but not limited to, a fee or a 335 commission, from the facility. The term includes providing 336 information about specific facilities or providers, arranging 337 tours or consultations, or coordinating placement in the 338 facility. 339 (2)(a)âAt the time of a referral, a referral agency shall 340 provide to the consumer a disclosure statement that includes all 341 of the following: 342 1.âA description of the referral agencyâs services. 343 2.âA statement on whether the consumer or the assisted 344 living facility to which the consumer is referred is responsible 345 for paying the referral fee. 346 3.âA statement that the consumer may stop using the 347 referral agency at any time without cause or penalty. 348 4.âA statement identifying the date of expiration of the 349 referral services being provided to the consumer, including an 350 explanation that after the expiration of the referral services, 351 neither the consumer nor the assisted living facility that the 352 consumer chooses is responsible for paying any referral fee. 353 5.âA statement disclosing whether the referral agency has 354 contracts with the recommended assisted living facilities. 355 6.âA notice that the consumer has the right to request 356 information about all assisted living facilities in the 357 requested geographic area which meet the consumerâs stated 358 preferences and care needs, including facilities with which the 359 referral agency does not have a contractual relationship. 360 (b)âIf a consumer decides to stop using a referral agency, 361 the referral agency shall communicate the consumerâs decision to 362 all assisted living facilities to which the referral agency has 363 referred the consumer. A consumerâs decision to stop using a 364 referral agency does not affect a contractual agreement, if any, 365 between the referral agency and an assisted living facility. 366 (3)âA referral agency may not: 367 (a)âRefer a consumer to an assisted living facility in 368 which the referral agency has an ownership, management, or 369 financial interest; 370 (b)âHold a power of attorney for a consumer or hold a 371 consumerâs property in any capacity; 372 (c)âKnowingly refer a consumer to an assisted living 373 facility that is unlicensed and is not exempt from licensing 374 under applicable law; 375 (d)âCollect a referral fee when a consumer moves to a 376 different assisted living facility, unless the consumer has 377 engaged the referral agency to help facilitate his or her move 378 to a different facility; or 379 (e)âCollect a referral fee after the expiration of the 380 referral according to the contract between the referral agency 381 and the assisted living facility. 382 (4)âIf a referral agency refers a consumer to an assisted 383 living facility, the referral agency must immediately notify the 384 assisted living facility of the referral by a written physical 385 or electronic document that includes the time and date of the 386 referral. Such notification must include a copy of the 387 disclosure statement provided to the consumer by the referral 388 agency. 389 (5)(a)âA written contract entered into between a referral 390 agency and an assisted living facility may provide for the 391 compensation of a referral agency for all referrals made with 392 respect to an assisted living facility. The amount of 393 compensation may be based on the volume or value of referrals 394 made by the referral agency or business generated between the 395 parties. 396 (b)âNotwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 397 compensation paid to a referral agency which is in compliance 398 with this section is not grounds for disciplinary action against 399 an assisted living facility. 400 (c)âA referral agency may not offer or enter into a 401 contract authorized under this section for compensation 402 otherwise prohibited under state or federal law. 403 Section 6.âPresent subsections (4), (6), (7), (8), (9), and 404 (10) of section 429.23, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 405 subsections (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8), respectively, and 406 subsection (2) and present subsections (3), (4), (5), and (9) of 407 that section are amended, to read: 408 429.23âInternal risk management and quality assurance 409 program; adverse incidents and reporting requirements.â 410 (2)âEvery facility licensed under this part is required to 411 maintain adverse incident reports. For purposes of this section, 412 the term, âadverse incidentâ means: 413 (a)âAn event over which facility personnel possess the 414 capacity, authority, or realistic ability to could exercise 415 control rather than as a result of the residentâs condition and 416 results in: 417 1.âDeath; 418 2.âBrain or spinal damage; 419 3.âPermanent disfigurement; 420 4.âFracture or dislocation of bones or joints; 421 5.âAny condition that required medical attention to which 422 the resident has not given his or her consent, including failure 423 to honor advanced directives; 424 6.âAny condition that requires the transfer of the resident 425 from the facility to a unit providing more acute care due to the 426 incident rather than the residentâs condition before the 427 incident; or 428 7.âAn event that is reported to law enforcement or its 429 personnel for investigation; or 430 (b)âResident elopement, if the elopement places the 431 resident at risk of harm or injury. 432 (3)âLicensed facilities shall provide within 1 business day 433 after the occurrence of an adverse incident, through the 434 agencyâs online portal, or if the portal is offline, by 435 electronic mail, a preliminary report to the agency on all 436 adverse incidents specified under this section. The report must 437 include information regarding the identity of the affected 438 resident, the type of adverse incident, and the status of the 439 facilityâs investigation of the incident. 440 (3)(4)âLicensed facilities shall provide Within 15 days 441 after the occurrence of an adverse incident, licensed facilities 442 shall provide, through the agencyâs online portal, or if the 443 portal is offline, by electronic mail, a full report to the 444 agency on all adverse incidents specified in this section. The 445 report must include information regarding the identity of the 446 affected resident, the type of adverse incident, and the results 447 of the facilityâs investigation into the adverse incident. 448 (5)âThree business days before the deadline for the 449 submission of the full report required under subsection (4), the 450 agency shall send by electronic mail a reminder to the 451 facilityâs administrator and other specified facility contacts. 452 Within 3 business days after the agency sends the reminder, a 453 facility is not subject to any administrative or other agency 454 action for failing to withdraw the preliminary report if the 455 facility determines the event was not an adverse incident or for 456 failing to file a full report if the facility determines the 457 event was an adverse incident. 458 (7)(9)âThe adverse incident reports and preliminary adverse 459 incident reports required under this section are confidential as 460 provided by law and are not discoverable or admissible in any 461 civil or administrative action, except in disciplinary 462 proceedings by the agency or appropriate regulatory board. 463 Section 7.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (4) of 464 section 429.256, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 465 429.256âAssistance with self-administration of medication 466 and with other tasks.â 467 (4)âAssistance with self-administration of medication does 468 not include: 469 (a)âMixing, compounding, converting, or calculating 470 medication doses, except for measuring a prescribed amount of 471 liquid medication, or breaking a scored tablet or crushing a 472 tablet as prescribed, or dialing an insulin pen prefilled by the 473 manufacturer. 474 (b)âThe preparation of syringes for injection or the 475 administration of medications by any injectable route, except 476 for the attachment of a new needle to an insulin pen prefilled 477 by the manufacturer. 478 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 479 (5) of section 429.26, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 480 429.26âAppropriateness of placements; examinations of 481 residents.â 482 (1)âThe owner or administrator of a facility is responsible 483 for determining the appropriateness of admission of an 484 individual to the facility and for determining the continued 485 appropriateness of residence of an individual in the facility. A 486 determination must be based upon an evaluation of the strengths, 487 needs, and preferences of the resident, a medical examination, 488 the care and services offered or arranged for by the facility in 489 accordance with facility policy, and any limitations in law or 490 rule related to admission criteria or continued residency for 491 the type of license held by the facility under this part. The 492 following criteria apply to the determination of appropriateness 493 for admission and continued residency of an individual in a 494 facility: 495 (a)âA facility may admit or retain a resident who receives 496 a health care service or treatment that is designed to be 497 provided within a private residential setting if all 498 requirements for providing that service or treatment are met by 499 the facility or a third party. The third party must provide 500 notes and reports pertaining to any change in condition of the 501 resident to the facility within 24 hours after each resident 502 visit in a manner agreed upon by the third party and the 503 facility. 504 (5)âEach resident must have been examined by a licensed 505 physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed 506 advanced practice registered nurse within 60 days before 507 admission to the facility or within 30 days after admission to 508 the facility, except as provided in s. 429.07. The information 509 from the medical examination must be recorded on the 510 practitionerâs form or on a form adopted by agency rule. The 511 medical examination form, completed to the extent deemed to be 512 appropriate by the practitioner, and signed only by the 513 practitioner, must be submitted to the owner or administrator of 514 the facility, who shall use the information contained therein to 515 assist in the determination of the appropriateness of the 516 residentâs admission to or continued residency in the facility. 517 The owner or administrator may request additional information to 518 be completed by the practitioner in the medical examination form 519 if necessary to determine appropriateness of admission or 520 continued residency in the facility. The medical examination 521 form may only be used to record the practitionerâs direct 522 observation of the patient at the time of examination and must 523 include the patientâs medical history. Such form does not 524 guarantee admission to, continued residency in, or the delivery 525 of services at the facility and must be used only as an 526 informative tool to assist in the determination of the 527 appropriateness of the residentâs admission to or continued 528 residency in the facility. The medical examination form, 529 reflecting the residentâs condition on the date the examination 530 is performed, becomes a permanent part of the facilityâs record 531 of the resident and must be made available to the agency during 532 inspection or upon request. An assessment that has been 533 completed through the Comprehensive Assessment and Review for 534 Long-Term Care Services (CARES) Program fulfills the 535 requirements for a medical examination under this subsection and 536 s. 429.07(3)(b)6. 537 Section 9.âSubsection (5) of section 429.41, Florida 538 Statutes, is amended to read: 539 429.41âRules establishing standards.â 540 (5)âThe agency may use an abbreviated biennial standard 541 licensure inspection that consists of, at a minimum, a desk 542 review of key quality-of-care standards in lieu of a full 543 inspection in a facility that has a good record of past 544 performance. However, a full inspection must be conducted in a 545 facility that has a history of class I or class II violations; 546 uncorrected class III violations; or a class I, class II, or 547 uncorrected class III violation resulting from a complaint 548 referred by the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program within 549 the previous licensure period immediately preceding the 550 inspection or if a potentially serious problem is identified 551 during the abbreviated inspection. The agency shall adopt by 552 rule the key quality-of-care standards. 553 Section 10.âSubsection (6) of section 429.52, Florida 554 Statutes, is amended to read: 555 429.52âStaff training and educational requirements.â 556 (6)âStaff assisting with the self-administration of 557 medications under s. 429.256 must complete a minimum of 6 558 additional hours of training provided by a registered nurse or a 559 licensed pharmacist before providing assistance. Additional 560 training and a determination of competency by a registered nurse 561 or a licensed pharmacist is required for dialing or attaching a 562 new needle to an insulin pen that is prefilled by the 563 manufacturer. Two hours of continuing education are required 564 annually thereafter. The agency shall establish by rule the 565 minimum requirements of this training. 566 Section 11.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of 567 section 429.55, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 568 429.55âConsumer information.â 569 (1)âCONSUMER INFORMATION WEBSITE.âThe Legislature finds 570 that consumers need additional information on the quality of 571 care and service in assisted living facilities in order to 572 select the best facility for themselves or their loved ones. 573 Therefore, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall 574 create content that is easily accessible through the home page 575 of the agencyâs website either directly or indirectly through 576 links to one or more other established websites of the agencyâs 577 choosing. The website must be searchable by facility name, 578 license type, city, or zip code. By November 1, 2015, the agency 579 shall include all content in its possession on the website and 580 add content when received from facilities. At a minimum, the 581 content must include: 582 (a)âInformation on each licensed assisted living facility, 583 including, but not limited to: 584 1.âThe name and address of the facility. 585 2.âThe name of the owner or operator of the facility. 586 3.âThe number and type of licensed beds in the facility, 587 including the planned number of beds by license, category, 588 specialization, and Medicaid coverage. 589 4.âThe types of licenses held by the facility. 590 5.âThe facilityâs license expiration date and status. 591 6.âThe total number of clients that the facility is 592 licensed to serve and the most recently available occupancy 593 levels. 594 7.âThe number of private and semiprivate rooms offered. 595 8.âThe bed-hold policy. 596 9.âThe religious affiliation, if any, of the assisted 597 living facility. 598 10.âThe languages spoken by the staff. 599 11.âAvailability of nurses. 600 12.âForms of payment accepted, including, but not limited 601 to, Medicaid, Medicaid long-term managed care, private 602 insurance, health maintenance organization, United States 603 Department of Veterans Affairs, CHAMPUS program, or workersâ 604 compensation coverage. 605 13.âIndication if the licensee is operating under 606 bankruptcy protection. 607 14.âRecreational and other programs available. 608 15.âSpecial care units or programs offered. 609 16.âWhether the facility is a part of a retirement 610 community that offers other services pursuant to this part or 611 part III of this chapter, part II or part III of chapter 400, or 612 chapter 651. 613 17.âLinks to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program 614 website and the programâs statewide toll-free telephone number. 615 18.âLinks to the websites of the providers. 616 19.âOther relevant information that the agency currently 617 collects. 618 (b)âSurvey and violation information for the facility, 619 including a list of the facilityâs violations committed during 620 the previous 60 months, until such a time as a change of 621 ownership occurs, provided that the former and new ownership do 622 not share any direct or indirect controlling interest which on 623 July 1, 2015, may include violations committed on or after July 624 1, 2010. The list must shall be updated monthly and include all 625 of the following for each violation: 626 1.âA summary of the violation, including all licensure, 627 revisit, and complaint survey information, presented in a manner 628 understandable by the general public. 629 2.âAny sanctions imposed by final order. 630 3.âThe date the corrective action was confirmed by the 631 agency. 632 633 The agency may adopt rules to administer this section. 634 Section 12.âSection 429.56, Florida Statutes, is created to 635 read: 636 429.56âAssisted Living Task Force.â 637 (1)âThe Assisted Living Task Force, a task force as defined 638 in s. 20.03(5), is created adjunct to the agency to address the 639 increasing demand for assisted living services due to the aging 640 population, addressing the future of senior living in a way that 641 promotes personalized care, increasing flexibility in facility 642 operations, and encouraging increased investment in the assisted 643 living industry. The agency shall provide administrative support 644 services relating to the functions of the task force for the 645 purposes of carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the 646 task force. 647 (2)(a)âThe task force is composed of the following members: 648 1.âA person appointed by the President of the Senate. 649 2.âA person appointed by the Speaker of the House of 650 Representatives. 651 3.âThe secretary of the agency, or his or her designee. 652 4.âThe secretary of the Department of Elderly Affairs, or 653 his or her designee. 654 5.âThe secretary of the Department of Children and 655 Families, or his or her designee. 656 6.âA representative from the Florida Senior Living 657 Association. 658 7.âA representative from the Florida Health Care 659 Association. 660 8.âA representative from LeadingAge Southeast. 661 9.âA representative from the Florida Assisted Living 662 Association. 663 10.âA representative from the Alzheimerâs Association. 664 11.âA representative from the Florida Chapter of the 665 American Association of Retired Persons. 666 12.âThe following members of the task force shall be 667 appointed by the secretary of the agency, from nominees 668 recommended by the associations listed in subparagraphs 6.-9.: 669 a.âA representative of senior housing real estate 670 investment trusts. 671 b.âA representative of assisted living facility owners. 672 c.âA representative of assisted living facility 673 administrators. 674 d.âA representative of assisted living facility management 675 companies. 676 e.âA representative of assisted living facility Alzheimerâs 677 disease or other related disorders providers. 678 f.âA representative of continuing care facilities. 679 g.âA representative of assisted living facility limited 680 nursing services providers. 681 h.âA representative of assisted living facility limited 682 mental health providers. 683 i.âA representative of assisted living facility extended 684 congregate care providers. 685 13.âThe following members of the task force shall be 686 appointed by the secretary of the agency, from among nominees 687 presented by the entities listed in subparagraphs 4., 5., 10., 688 and 11.: 689 a.âA representative of residents. 690 b.âA representative of resident families. 691 (b)âMembers of the task force shall serve without 692 compensation. Each member serves at the pleasure of the official 693 who appointed the member. A vacancy on the task force must be 694 filled in the same manner as the original appointment. 695 (c)âThe task force shall elect from among its members a 696 chair to serve for 1 year. At the end of his or her term, a new 697 chair shall be elected in the same manner. The chair may create 698 committees or work groups to help with tasks, such as research, 699 scheduling speakers, and drafting reports and policy 700 recommendations. 701 (d)âMembers of the task force shall be appointed, and the 702 task force shall hold its first meeting by October 1, 2026. The 703 task force shall meet quarterly or sooner upon the call of the 704 chair or upon the request of a majority of its members. The task 705 force may hold its meetings in person or by teleconference or 706 other electronic means; however, all meetings must have 707 teleconference or electronic capabilities. Notices for any 708 scheduled meetings of the task force must be published in 709 advance on the agencyâs website. 710 (3)âThe duties of the task force include, but are not 711 limited to, all of the following: 712 (a)âIdentify innovative, person-centered care models to 713 meet the diverse needs of the stateâs aging population, as well 714 as age in place protocols to prevent or reduce the transfer of 715 residents to more acute settings when possible. 716 (b)âIdentify laws and regulations that would benefit from 717 modernization to enhance the stateâs place as the national 718 leader in senior living. These recommendations must include, but 719 are not limited to, developing compliance process improvements 720 to reduce administrative burdens and enhance operational 721 efficiency and updating resident rights and adverse incident 722 reporting. 723 (c)âIdentify opportunities to position Florida 724 strategically as the national leader in the senior living 725 industry with a focus on attracting investors, owners, 726 operators, and an increased workforce. 727 (d)âCreate a needs assessment with policy recommendations 728 to assess and improve the impact of the stateâs growing aging 729 population on assisted living facilities. The task force must 730 incorporate national trends and emerging issues, including, but 731 not limited to, facility licensing, bed capacity, staffing, and 732 service delivery to best inform recommendations and maintain the 733 stateâs relevance and leadership in the industry. 734 (e)âSuggest enhancements to improve the collection and use 735 of assisted living facility data, with a focus on promoting 736 accuracy and transparency. 737 (4)(a)âThe agency shall provide reports and information 738 requested by the task force to assist the task force in 739 fulfilling its duties. 740 (b)âThe task force shall submit interim status reports 741 detailing the efforts of the task force and findings and 742 recommendations to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 743 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by October 1, 744 2027, and October 1, 2028, and a final report by September 1, 745 2029. The reports must be made available on the agencyâs 746 website. 747 (5)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is 748 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 749 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 750 Section 13.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.